District of Columbia statutes.
7-2508.06

Rules.

The Chief, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules and establish such forms as are necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VIII, § 806
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 205, 56 DCR 7413
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 205 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).